indomorph/hin/nouns.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc for Hindi!!!
Multichar_Symbols
! Symbols to be substituted from regular expressions in hin.xfst
^GUESSCLASSISTEM
^GUESSCLASSIISTEM
^GUESSCLASSIIISTEM
^GUESSCLASSIVSTEM
! Feature for analyses with guessed stems
+Guess
! Morphological properties
+N +Masc
+Fem +Masc
+Sg +Pl
+Dir +Obl +Voc

LEXICON Root
0:0 NounStem ;

LEXICON ClassI
+N+Masc+Dir+Sg:ा # ; ! -aː
+N+Masc+Dir+Sg:आ # ; ! -aː
+N+Masc+Obl+Sg:े Enclitic ; ! -e
+N+Masc+Obl+Sg:ए Enclitic ; ! -e
+N+Masc+Voc+Sg:े # ; ! -e
+N+Masc+Voc+Sg:ए # ; ! -e
+N+Masc+Dir+Pl:े # ; ! -e
+N+Masc+Dir+Pl:ए # ; ! -e
+N+Masc+Obl+Pl:ों Enclitic ; ! -õ
+N+Masc+Obl+Pl:ओं Enclitic ; ! -õ
+N+Masc+Obl+Pl:ोँ Enclitic ; ! -õ
+N+Masc+Obl+Pl:ओँ Enclitic ; ! -õ
+N+Masc+Voc+Pl:ो # ; ! -o
+N+Masc+Voc+Pl:ओ # ; ! -o

LEXICON ClassII
+N+Masc+Dir+Sg:0 # ;
+N+Masc+Dir+Pl:0 # ;
+N+Masc+Obl+Sg:0 Enclitic ;
+N+Masc+Obl+Pl:ो Enclitic ; ! -o
+N+Masc+Obl+Pl:योँ Enclitic ; ! -jõ
+N+Masc+Voc+Sg:0 # ;
+N+Masc+Voc+Pl:ो # ; ! -o
+N+Masc+Voc+Pl:यो # ; ! -jo

LEXICON ClassIII
+N+Fem+Dir+Sg:ी # ; ! -iː
+N+Fem+Dir+Sg:ई # ; ! -iː
+N+Fem+Obl+Sg:ी Enclitic ; ! -iː
+N+Fem+Obl+Sg:ई Enclitic ; ! -iː
+N+Fem+Voc+Sg:ी # ; ! -iː
+N+Fem+Voc+Sg:ई # ; ! -iː
+N+Fem+Dir+Pl:ियाँ # ; ! -ijãː
+N+Fem+Dir+Pl:इयाँ # ; ! -ijãː
+N+Fem+Obl+Pl:ियों Enclitic ; ! -ijõ
+N+Fem+Obl+Pl:इयों Enclitic ; ! -ijõ
+N+Fem+Obl+Pl:ियों Enclitic ; ! -ijõ
+N+Fem+Obl+Pl:इयों Enclitic ; ! -ijõ
+N+Fem+Voc+Pl:ियो # ; ! -ijo
+N+Fem+Voc+Pl:इयो # ; ! -ijo

LEXICON ClassIV
+N+Fem+Dir+Sg:0 # ; !
+N+Fem+Obl+Sg:0 Enclitic ; !
+N+Fem+Voc+Sg:0 # ; !
+N+Fem+Dir+Pl:ेँ # ; ! -e
+N+Fem+Dir+Pl:एँ # ; ! -e
+N+Fem+Obl+Pl:ों Enclitic ; ! -õ
+N+Fem+Obl+Pl:ओं Enclitic ; ! -õ
+N+Fem+Voc+Pl:ो # ; ! -o
+N+Fem+Voc+Pl:ओ # ; ! -o

LEXICON Enclitic
+Erg:ने # ; ! -ne
+Acc:को # ; ! -ko
+Dat:को # ; ! -ko
+Inst:से # ; ! -se
+Gen:का # ; ! -kaː
+Loc:में # ; ! -mẽ
+Loc:पर् # ; ! -par
0:0 # ;

LEXICON NounStem
अतोषणीय ClassIV ; ! /atoʂɳiːj/ implacable, insatiable
अधपक ClassI ; ! /ad̤pəkaː/ underdone, soft-boiled
अधोगाम ClassIII ; ! /ad̤oɡaːmiː/ downhill
अनुत्तीर्ण ClassIV ; ! /anuttiːrɳə/ failed
अनैतिकत ClassI ; ! /anæːtiktaː/ wickedness, darkness
अप्रत्यक्ष ClassIV ; ! /aprətjəkʂə/ subterraneous, indirect
अभिलाष ClassI ; ! /ab̤ilaːʂaː/ wish, wishing
अभिलाष ClassIII ; ! /ab̤ilaːʂiː/ desirous, wishful
अर्ल ClassIV ; ! /arlə/ earl
अविवाहित ClassI ; ! /avivaːɦitaː/ spinster
अष्टपद ClassIII ; ! /aʂʈəpdiː/ octave
असहमत ClassIV ; ! /asɦəmət/ dissenting, at loggerheads
अंदाज़ ClassI ; ! /ndaːzaː/ flavour
आकार ClassIV ; ! /aːkaːr/ size, turn
आग्रह ClassIII ; ! /aːɡrəɦiː/ stickler
आधुनिकत ClassI ; ! /aːd̤uniktaː/ modernity, modernism
आम्र ClassIV ; ! /aːmrə/ mango
आशावाद ClassIII ; ! /aːʃaːvaːdiː/ upbeat, positive
इतिहास ClassIV ; ! /itiɦaːs/ history, story
इतिहासवेत्त ClassI ; ! /itiɦaːsvettaː/ historian
उतरन ClassI ; ! /utrənaː/ alight, land
उत्तराधिकार ClassIII ; ! /uttəraːd̤ikaːriː/ inheritance, successor
उत्परिवर्तन ClassIV ; ! /utpərivrtən/ mutate
उर्वरत ClassI ; ! /urvərtaː/ fecundity, fertility
उलझाव ClassIV ; ! /uld͡ʒ̤aːv/ tangle, implication
एचआईव ClassIII ; ! /et͡ʃəaiːviː/ HIV
एंटिन ClassI ; ! /enʈinaː/ aerial
ऑक्टोपस ClassIV ; ! /ऑkʈopəs/ octopus
कठपुतल ClassIII ; ! /kəʈʰputliː/ glove puppet, puppet
कणिक ClassI ; ! /kəɳikaː/ granule, corpuscle
कमान ClassIV ; ! /kəmaːn/ command
कर्महीनत ClassI ; ! /kərməɦiːntaː/ inaction, inactiveness
कवा ClassIII ; ! /kəvaːiː/ Kauai
कारगर ClassIV ; ! /kaːrɡər/ effective, workmanlike
काहिर ClassI ; ! /kaːɦiraː/ Cairo, El Qahira
कांट ClassIII ; ! /kaːnʈiː/ nail
कुलिन ClassIV ; ! /kulin/ nobleman
कुल्फ ClassIII ; ! /kulpʰiː/ ice cream
कुव्यवस्थ ClassI ; ! /kuvjəvstʰaː/ maladministration
कोशिक ClassI ; ! /koʃikaː/ cell
कौतुक ClassIV ; ! /kɔːtuk/ amusement, devilment
कंगन ClassIII ; ! /kəŋɡniː/ cornice, eaves
खपर ClassI ; ! /kʰəpraː/ shard, tile
खरबूज ClassIV ; ! /kʰərbuːd͡ʒ/ melon
खास ClassIII ; ! /kʰaːsiː/ linguistic communication
ख़ुद ClassI ; ! /xudaː/ God, deity
गढ़ ClassIII ; ! /ɡəɽ̥iː/ chateau, edifice
गतिशीलत ClassI ; ! /ɡətiʃiːltaː/ dynamism, mobility
गफलत ClassIV ; ! /ɡəpʰlət/ negligence
गिर ClassI ; ! /ɡiraː/ kernel
गुड़गुड़ ClassIII ; ! /ɡuɽɡuɽiː/ hookah, sheesha
गृहासक्त ClassIV ; ! /ɡr̩ɦaːsktə/ homesick
गेंद ClassI ; ! /ɡendaː/ marigold
घटत ClassIII ; ! /ɡ̤əʈtiː/ decrease
घृणास्पद ClassIV ; ! /ɡ̤r̩ɳaːspəd/ nauseous, repellent
चटोर ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃəʈoraː/ tiger
चरब ClassIII ; ! /t͡ʃərbiː/ flesh, fat
चीक ClassIV ; ! /t͡ʃiːk/ scream, shriek
चुनाव ClassIII ; ! /t͡ʃunaːviː/ electoral
चुभत ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃub̤taː/ causticity
छोकर ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃʰokraː/ chap, lad
छोलदार ClassIII ; ! /t͡ʃʰoldaːriː/ wall tent, tent
जकड़ ClassIV ; ! /d͡ʒəkəɽ/ clench, clinch
जल्दबाज ClassIII ; ! /d͡ʒəldəbaːd͡ʒiː/ Rushing
जानवर ClassIV ; ! /d͡ʒaːnvər/ brute, animal
जिसक ClassI ; ! /d͡ʒiskaː/ which
जिंदादिल ClassIII ; ! /d͡ʒindaːdiliː/ animal spirits, jocundity
जोशपूर्ण ClassIV ; ! /d͡ʒoʃpuːrɳə/ zesty, spirited
झिर ClassIII ; ! /d͡ʒ̤iriː/ aperture, slot
झूल ClassI ; ! /d͡ʒ̤uːlaː/ hammock, ride
टेलीविज़न ClassIV ; ! /ʈeliːvizən/ TV
ठोड़ ClassIII ; ! /ʈʰoɽiː/ chin
डील ClassI ; ! /ɖiːlaː/ easy
डेरिक ClassIV ; ! /ɖerik/ derrick
तथ्यान्वेष ClassIII ; ! /tətʰjaːnveʂiː/ fact-finding
तहदार ClassIV ; ! /təɦdaːr/ tiered
ताग ClassI ; ! /taːɡaː/ yarn, thread
तिल्ल ClassIII ; ! /tilliː/ spleen
तंत्रिकातंत्र ClassIV ; ! /təntrikaːtəntrə/ systema nervosum
थोपन ClassI ; ! /tʰopnaː/ press, fasten
दक्खिन ClassIII ; ! /dəkkʰiniː/ southern
दाय ClassIV ; ! /daːj/ hereditament, due
दिलेर ClassIII ; ! /dileriː/ mettle, boldness
दुलार ClassI ; ! /dulaːraː/ <somebody> blue-eyed boy
देवमंदिर ClassIV ; ! /devməndir/ temple
देस ClassIII ; ! /desiː/ indigenous
धुँधलापन ClassIV ; ! /d̤əũd̤əlaːpən/ haziness, vapourousness
धोखेबाज़ ClassIII ; ! /d̤okʰebaːziː/ deceit, fraudulence
नकारन ClassI ; ! /nəkaːrnaː/ negate, deny
नाइजीरिया ClassIII ; ! /naːid͡ʒiːrijaːiː/ Nigerian
नाजायज़ ClassIV ; ! /naːd͡ʒaːjəz/ bootleg
निर्ख ClassIV ; ! /nirkʰə/ quotation
निर्धनत ClassI ; ! /nird̤əntaː/ need
निशान ClassIII ; ! /niʃaːniː/ souvenir, remembrance
नूह ClassIV ; ! /nuːɦ/ Noah
पढ़न ClassI ; ! /pəɽ̥ənaː/ perusal, reading
पतल ClassIII ; ! /pətliː/ skinny, tapered
परख ClassIV ; ! /pərəkʰ/ test, assay
पलायनवाद ClassIII ; ! /pəlaːjnəvaːdiː/ escapist
पहाड़ ClassIV ; ! /pəɦaːɽ/ mount, mountain
पादुक ClassI ; ! /paːdukaː/ footwear, sandal
पुजार ClassIII ; ! /pud͡ʒaːriː/ man of God, priest
पुनरुत्थान ClassIV ; ! /punruttʰaːn/ revivification, resurgence
पेचीद ClassI ; ! /pet͡ʃiːdaː/ catchy, ticklish
पोटल ClassIII ; ! /poʈliː/ swag
प्रतिजन ClassIV ; ! /prətid͡ʒən/ antigen
प्रर्दशन ClassIII ; ! /prərdəʃniː/ show
प्रार्थन ClassI ; ! /praːrtʰənaː/ petition, supplication
फर ClassIV ; ! /pʰər/ fur
फिरक ClassIII ; ! /pʰirkiː/ bobbin, gig
बखेड़ ClassI ; ! /bəkʰeɽaː/ fuss, hustle
बड़ा ClassIII ; ! /bəɽaːiː/ boast, eulogy
बलवा ClassIII ; ! /bəlvaːiː/ insurgent, mutineer
बहुध ClassI ; ! /bəɦud̤aː/ chiefly, as usual
बहुसांस्कृतिक ClassIV ; ! /bəɦusaːnskr̩tik/ multicultural
बालवाड़ ClassIII ; ! /baːlvaːɽiː/ kindergarten
बुवा ClassIII ; ! /buvaːiː/ sowing
बूट ClassI ; ! /buːʈaː/ plant
बैचेन ClassIII ; ! /bæːt͡ʃeniː/ discomfiture, jactitation
बैरल ClassIV ; ! /bæːrəl/ barrel
भरन ClassI ; ! /b̤ərnaː/ stuff, load
भस्म ClassIII ; ! /b̤əsmiː/ cinereous
मग ClassIV ; ! /məɡ/ mug
मछल ClassIII ; ! /mət͡ʃʰliː/ fish
मजाकिय ClassI ; ! /məd͡ʒaːkijaː/ funny
मस्त ClassIII ; ! /məstiː/ spirit, jollification
मानसिकत ClassI ; ! /maːnsiktaː/ mentality, mind-set
मिक्क ClassIII ; ! /mikkiː/ Mickey
मिजाज़ ClassIV ; ! /mid͡ʒaːz/ humor
मुंगर ClassIII ; ! /muŋɡriː/ mall, mallet
मूंदन ClassI ; ! /muːndnaː/ close, cover
मंगोलियन ClassIV ; ! /məŋɡolijən/ Mongolian, Mogul
मंत्र ClassIII ; ! /məntriː/ minister
रगड़न ClassI ; ! /rəɡɽənaː/ rub down, scuff
रिसेप्शनिस्ट ClassIV ; ! /risepʃənisʈə/ receptionist
रूढिवाद ClassIII ; ! /ruːɖ̤ivaːdiː/ stereotype
लग ClassI ; ! /ləɡaː/ took
लेड ClassIV ; ! /leɖ/ lead
लोट ClassIII ; ! /loʈiː/ lot
लोथड़ ClassI ; ! /lotʰɽaː/ joint
वित्तिय ClassIV ; ! /vittij/ fiscal year
विलासित ClassI ; ! /vilaːsitaː/ voluptuousness, indulgence
वैर ClassIII ; ! /væːriː/ hostile, adversary
व्यथित ClassIV ; ! /vjətʰit/ aggrieved, agitated
शुद्धत ClassI ; ! /ʃudd̤ətaː/ purity, pureness
श्लेष ClassIV ; ! /ʃleʂ/ wordplay, pun
सफा ClassIII ; ! /səpʰaːiː/ sweep, defence
समो ClassI ; ! /səmoaː/ Western Samoa, Samoa i Sisifo
सलाम ClassIV ; ! /səlaːm/ low
सावधान ClassIII ; ! /saːvd̤aːniː/ discreetness, cautiousness
सिरफिर ClassI ; ! /sirpʰiraː/ mad as a March hare, mad as a hatter
सुनियोजित ClassIV ; ! /sunijod͡ʒit/ unclouded, organized
सोख्त ClassI ; ! /sokʰtaː/ blotter
संतर ClassIII ; ! /səntriː/ sentinel, sentry
संपीडन ClassIV ; ! /səmpiːɖən/ compression
स्विटज़रलैंड ClassIV ; ! /sviʈzərlæːnɖə/ Switzerland
हक्काबक्क ClassI ; ! /ɦəkkaːbkkaː/ disamayed, aghast
हिजर ClassIII ; ! /ɦid͡ʒriː/ Hegira, Muslim calendar
अँगूठा ClassI ;
अधीक्षक ClassII ;
अमृत ClassII ;
आउट ClassII ;
आक्रामकता ClassIV ;
आमने ClassII ;
इंटरनेशनल ClassII ;
उजागर ClassII ;
उपायुक्त ClassII ;
एमडी ClassII ;
कंडोम ClassII ;
कर्फ्यू ClassII ;
कार्निवाल ClassII ;
केबल ClassII ;
क्राउन ClassII ;
ख्याल ClassII ;
गुरूद्वारा ClassI ;
गृह ClassII ;
घुमंतु ClassII ;
चौधरी ClassII ;
जाट ClassII ;
जोडी ClassIV ;
ज्योतिषी ClassII ;
ट्रिब्यूनल ClassII ;
डॉ. ClassII ;
तीन ClassII ;
दाँत ClassII ;
दृष्टा ClassI ;
द्वंद्व ClassII ;
नरमपंथी ClassII ;
निर्वहन ClassII ;
पंजीकरण ClassII ;
परिश्रम ClassII ;
पीएसयू ClassII ;
पैनल ClassII ;
प्रत्यारोपण ClassII ;
प्रारूप ClassII ;
फायर ClassII ;
फुर्सत ClassIV ;
बटेर ClassII ;
बिजलीघर ClassII ;
ब्रजवासी ClassII ;
भतीजा ClassI ;
भूमि ClassIII ;
भोजन ClassII ;
मनोरोगी ClassII ;
मार्च ClassII ;
मूल ClassII ;
युगांतर ClassII ;
राजस्थान ClassII ;
रेफरेंस ClassII ;
लेंटर ClassII ;
वल्र्रर्ड ClassII ;
विद्यालय ClassII ;
विधायिका ClassIV ;
वेक्टर ClassII ;
शहीद ClassII ;
श्रमिक ClassII ;
संशय ClassII ;
सदमा ClassI ;
समावेश ClassII ;
सामान ClassII ;
सुरक्षाकर्मी ClassII ;
सॉफ्टवेयर ClassII ;
स्पेस ClassII ;
हाउस ClassII ;
क़ायदेआज़म ClassII ;
